Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2572.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 181.9445, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Employee. new text begin (a) new text end "Employee" means any person who is employed by an employer, including temporary and part-time employees, whonew text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end is anticipated by the employer to perform work for at least 80 hours in a year for that employer in Minnesotadeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (2) the employer chooses to provide benefits for under sections 181.9445 to 181.9448. new text end new text begin (b)new text end Employee does not include: (1) an independent contractor; (2) an individual who is a volunteer firefighter or paid on-call firefighter, with a department charged with the prevention or suppression of fires within the boundaries of the state; is a volunteer ambulance attendant as defined in section 144E.001, subdivision 15; or is an ambulance service personnel as defined in section 144E.001, subdivision 3a, who serves in a paid on-call position; (3) an individual who is an elected official or a person who is appointed to fill a vacancy in an elected office as part of a legislative or governing body of Minnesota or a political subdivision; or (4) an individual employed by a farmer, family farm, or a family farm corporation to provide physical labor on or management of a farm if the farmer, family farm, or family farm corporation employs the individual to perform work for 28 days or less each year. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 181.9445, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Employer. "Employer" means a person who has one or more employeesnew text begin that the person chooses to provide benefits for under sections 181.9445 to 181.9448new text end . Employer includes an individual, a corporation, a partnership, an association, a business trust, a nonprofit organization, a group of persons, the state of Minnesota, a county, town, city, school district, or other governmental subdivision. In the case of an employee leasing company or professional employer organization, the taxpaying employer, as described in section 268.046, subdivision 1, remains the employer. In the case of an individual provider within the meaning of section 256B.0711, subdivision 1, paragraph (d), the employer includes any participant within the meaning of section 256B.0711, subdivision 1, paragraph (e), or participant's representative within the meaning of section 256B.0711, subdivision 1, paragraph (f). In the event that a temporary employee is supplied by a staffing agency, absent a contractual agreement stating otherwise, that individual shall be an employee of the staffing agency for all purposes of section 177.50 and sections 181.9445 to 181.9448. Employer does not include the United States government.